Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202021-510
Name.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section, the name of a protected series must be distinguishable in the records of the Secretary of State from:

(1) the name of each person that is not an individual and that is incorporated, organized, or authorized to transact business in this state; and

(2) each name reserved under section 21-109 or other state laws allowing the reservation or registration of business names, including fictitious or assumed name statutes.

(b) The name of a protected series of a series limited liability company must:

(1) begin with the name of the company, including any word or abbreviation required by section 21-108; and

(2) contain the phrase Protected Series or protected series or the abbreviation P.S. or PS.

(c) If a series limited liability company changes its name, the company shall deliver to the Secretary of State for filing a statement of designation change for the company’s protected series, changing the name of each protected series to comply with this section.

Laws 2018, LB1121, § 11;

Laws 2019, LB78, § 5.
January 1, 2021